Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3219
Electric and communication facilities; easement; license and agreement for construction, operation, and maintenance; fiduciaries; execution.

Administrators and executors of the estates of deceased persons, trustees of trust estates, the guardians of estates of minors and incompetent persons, and conservators may execute easements, licenses, and other contracts with public power districts, electric membership associations, cooperative corporations, individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations for the construction, operation, and maintenance of electric generation, transmission, or distribution facilities or facilities for the transmission or distribution of communications upon such terms and conditions as the administrators, executors, trustees, guardians, or conservators of such persons deem reasonable and equitable, and for the best interests of the estates of deceased persons, minors, incompetents, and beneficiaries of a trust.

Laws 1961, c. 462, § 1, p. 1406;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 552;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-337;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 434.

Oil and gas pipeline easements, powers, see section 57-401.